Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.080

Human resource services available on request to certain governmental entities—Reimbursement.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the office of financial management and the department of enterprise services may make their human resource services available on request, on a reimbursable basis, to:

(1) Either the legislative or the judicial branch of the state government;

(2) Any county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision of the state;

(3) The institutions of higher learning;

(4) Any agency, class, or position set forth in RCW 41.06.070.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 403; 1970 ex.s. c 12 s 2. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 152 s 2; 1969 c 45 s 5; 1961 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.